Utah statutes.
72-7-504.   Advertising prohibited near interstate or primary system -- Exceptions -- Logo advertising -- Department rules.

(1)  Outdoor advertising that is capable of being read or comprehended from any place on the main-traveled way of an interstate or primary system may not be erected or maintained, except:

(a)  directional and other official signs and notices authorized or required by law, including signs and notices pertaining to natural wonders and scenic and historic attractions, informational or directional signs regarding utility service, emergency telephone signs, buried or underground utility markers, and above ground utility closure signs;

(b)  signs advertising the sale or lease of property upon which they are located;

(c)  signs advertising activities conducted on the property where they are located, including signs on the premises of a public assembly facility as provided in Section 72-7-504.5;

(d)  signs located in a commercial or industrial zone;

(e)  signs located in unzoned industrial or commercial areas as determined from actual land uses; and

(f)  logo advertising under Subsection (2).

(2) (a)  The department may itself or by contract erect, administer, and maintain informational signs on the main-traveled way of an interstate or primary system for the display of logo advertising and information of interest to the traveling public if:

(i)  the department complies with Title 63G, Chapter 6a, Utah Procurement Code, in the lease or other contract agreement with a private party for the sign or sign space; and

(ii)  the private party for the lease of the sign or sign space pays an amount set by the department to be paid to the department or the party under contract with the department under this Subsection (2).

(b)  The amount shall be sufficient to cover the costs of erecting, administering, and maintaining the signs or sign spaces.

(c)  The department may consult the Governor's Office of Economic Development in carrying out this Subsection (2).

(3) (a)  Revenue generated under Subsection (2) shall be:

(i)  applied first to cover department costs under Subsection (2); and

(ii)  deposited in the Transportation Fund.

(b)  Revenue in excess of costs under Subsection (2)(a) shall be deposited in the General Fund as a dedicated credit for use by the Governor's Office of Economic Development no later than the following fiscal year.

(4)  Outdoor advertising under Subsections (1)(a), (d), (e), and (f) shall conform to the rules made by the department under Sections 72-7-506 and 72-7-507.



Amended by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session

